Illinois, session 104th, SB665.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Intergenerational Poverty Act is amended by 5changing Section 95-101 as follows: 6    (305 ILCS 70/95-101)7    Sec. 95-101. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Intergenerational Poverty Act. References in this Article to 9"this Act" mean this Article.10(Source: P.A. 101-636, eff. 6-10-20.)